Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Penalties

116.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]

116.995.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully fails to perform any of his duties as set forth in this chapter shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense. Each day of refusal to serve and carry out the duties as prescribed by law shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 17.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The penalty provision, this section, would be applicable to those members of the board of elections who willfully failed to comply with the requirements of KRS

116.125

concerning notification of purged voters.

OAG 80-80

.